Hawaii statutes.
[§509-3] Tenancy by the
entirety when owners change relationship status. (a) When two individuals
who hold property as tenants by the entirety enter into a different legal
relationship with each other that also allows them to hold property as tenants
by the entirety, their ownership as tenants by the entirety shall be
continuous:

(1) If the new legal relationship is entered into
simultaneously with the termination of the earlier legal relationship; or

(2) If the new legal relationship is entered into within
ninety days after the termination of the earlier legal relationship; provided
that no liens were perfected and attached on the property in the interim.

(b) The continuity of a tenancy by the
entirety under this section shall apply to couples married under chapter 572,
civil union partners under chapter 572B, and reciprocal beneficiaries under
chapter 572C.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes any
individuals from opting to hold their property in another manner as permitted
under this chapter.

(d) Nothing in this section shall impact liens
perfected and attached on the property after the earlier legal relationship was
terminated and before January 1, 2012. [L 2012, c 267, §2]

Note

Section retroactive to January 1, 2012. L 2012, c 267, §20.

Revision Note

In subsection (d), "January 1, 2012" substituted
for "the date this Act became law upon its approval". The approval
date for Act 267 was July 6, 2012.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next